Maryland, session 2025, HB0567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
19–102.
This title applies only in Dorchester County.
19–1001.
– 1 –

Ch. 800 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THERE IS AN ARTS BEER AND WINE LICENSE.
(B) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A NONPROFIT OR
FOR–PROFIT RETAIL BUSINESS, INCLUDING AN ART CENTER, AN ART GALLERY, A
MUSEUM, OR A SIMILAR BUSINESS THAT IS PRIMARILY DEVOTED TO ART THAT
EXPRESSES MATTERS OF SERIOUS LITERARY, ARTISTIC, SCIENTIFIC, OR POLITICAL
VALUE, THAT:
(I) ENGAGES IN THE DISPLAY AND SALE OF ORIGINAL
ARTWORK; AND
(II) IS LOCATED IN AN ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A BUSINESS THAT
DISPLAYS AND SELLS COMMERCIALLY PREPARED OR MASS–PRODUCED ARTISTIC
PRODUCTS.
(3) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL OR SERVE BEER AND WINE:
(I) AT RETAIL FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION WHEN
SNACKS ARE SERVED; AND
(II) ON MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY, DURING NORMAL
BUSINESS HOURS BUT NOT EARLIER THAN 10 A.M. AND NOT LATER THAN 10 P.M.
(4) THE LICENSE MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED FROM THE LOCATION
FOR WHICH THE LICENSE WAS ORIGINALLY ISSUED TO ANOTHER LOCATION.
(C) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $250.
(D) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
19–1601.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Board may not
issue a new license for an establishment that is within 300 feet in a direct line of a place of
worship or a public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school.
(2) The distance from the establishment to the place of worship or the
public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school is to be measured from
the establishment in a direct line to the nearest point of the main building of the place of
worship or school.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 800
(b) The prohibition against issuing a license in subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to the issuance of:
(1) a license for a premises that was licensed on October 1, 1996;
(2) a Class B (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license for a premises in
Cambridge, Secretary, or Hurlock; [or]
(3) a temporary license; OR
(4) AN ARTS BEER AND WINE LICENSE IF THE BOARD RECEIVES
WRITTEN CONSENT TO THE ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE FROM EACH PLACE OF
WORSHIP OR SCHOOL LOCATED WITHIN 300 FEET IN A DIRECT LINE OF THE
ESTABLISHMENT FOR WHICH THE LICENSE IS SOUGHT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –